Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8710
Patient safety work product; confidentiality; use; restrictions.

(1) Patient safety work product shall be privileged and confidential.

(2) Patient safety work product shall not be:

(a) Subject to a civil, criminal, or administrative subpoena or order;

(b) Subject to discovery in connection with a civil, criminal, or administrative proceeding;

(c) Subject to disclosure pursuant to the Freedom of Information Act, 5 U.S.C. 552, as such act existed on April 28, 2005, or any other similar federal or state law, including sections 84-712 to 84-712.09;

(d) Offered in the presence of the jury or other factfinder or received into evidence in any civil, criminal, or administrative proceeding before any local, state, or federal tribunal; or

(e) If the patient safety work product is identifiable information and is received by a national accreditation organization in its capacity:

(i) Used by a national accreditation organization in an accreditation action against the provider that reported the information;

(ii) Shared by such organization with its survey team; or

(iii) Required as a condition of accreditation by a national accreditation organization.

Laws 2005, LB 361, § 10.